Utah statutes.
70C-5-101.   Definition -- Home solicitation sale.

As used in this chapter, "home solicitation sale" means a consumer credit sale of goods or services in which the seller or a person acting for him engages in a face-to-face solicitation of the sale at a residence or place of employment of the buyer and the buyer's agreement or offer to purchase is there given to the seller or a person acting for him.  It does not include a sale made pursuant to preexisting open-end accounts, or a sale made between the parties at a business establishment at a fixed location where goods or services are offered or exhibited for sale.

